Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1105.01
Gambling debt collection; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of gambling debt collection if he or she employs any force or intimidation or threatens force or intimidation in order to collect any debt which results from gambling as described in sections 28-1101 to 28-1109 and 28-1117.

(2) Gambling debt collection is a Class III felony.

Laws 1979, LB 152, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 9.